Massachusetts, session 194th, S978.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 30 of chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after subsection A, paragraph (e) the following:-
(f) to be eligible for the HomeBase program a person must be in the commonwealth for at
least one year.
of 1